Oklahoma, session 2025, HB2918.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5001 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Expanding
Access to Local Foods Act of 2025".
SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5002 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


Req. No. 11321 Page 1

A. As used in this act, "Market value" means the price that a
property would sell for in a competitive market under fair
conditions.
B. There is hereby created a program to purchase locally grown
fruits and vegetables from small and underserved producers in
Oklahoma to be administered by the Oklahoma Department of
Agriculture, Food, and Forestry. to accomplish the goals of this
act, the Department is authorized to use the funds available in the
Expanding Access to Local Foods Program Revolving Fund established
in Section 3 of this act. The purpose of the program is to maintain
and improve food and agricultural supply chain resiliency and expand
economic opportunities for small and underserved producers while
promoting food security.
C. The Department shall purchase at market value locally grown
fruits and vegetables from small and underserved producers in
Oklahoma and shall donate those fruits and vegetables to non-profits
in Oklahoma that distribute food within the state free of charge.
D. The Department shall promulgate rules and procedures to
effectuate the provisions of this act
SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 5007 of Title 2, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry to be
Req. No. 11321 Page 2

desi gnated the "Expanding Access to Local Foods Program Revolving
Fund". The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal
year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the
Department from appropriations, federal grants or funds, municipal
contributions, private contributions, and any other sources,
including interest earned from the income in the fund, that are
designated for deposit to such fund or designated for duties
associated with this act. All monies accruing to the credit of said
fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and expended by the
Oklahoma Department of Agriculture, Food, and Forestry to perform
the duties imposed on the Department by law. Expenditures from said
fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State Treasurer
against claims filed as prescribed by law with the Director of the
Office of Management and Enterprise Services for approval and
payment.
SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-11321 JL 01/04/25






Req. No. 11321 Page 3